sv: Mekanism för mörning av kött: Klubba; Multiverktyg/kombination; Nål/blad (Jaccard); Kavel; Övrigt
ru: Механизм размягчителя мяса: Молоток; Многофункциональный/комбинированный инструмент; Игла/лезвие (типа Jaccard); Роликовый; Другое
bg-BG: Механизъм на чукчето за месо: Дървен чук; Мултифункционален/комбиниран инструмент; Игла/острие (Jaccard); Точилка; Друго
fr: Type de mécanisme de l’attendrisseur de viande: Maillet; Multi-outils/combiné; Aiguille/lame (Jaccard); Rouleau; Autre
zh-CN: 嫩肉器机制: 锤式; 多功能工具/组合; 针/刀片 (Jaccard); 擀面杖式; 其他
pl: Mechanizm tłuczka do mięsa: Tłuczek; Wielofunkcyjny / combo; Igłowy / ostrzowy; Wałek; Pozostałe
da: Kødhammermekanisme: Hammer; Multiværktøj/kombination; Nål/klinge (Jaccard); Rulle; Andet
sk-SK: Mechanizmus tĺčika na mäso: Perlík; Multifunkčný nástroj/kombinácia; Ihla/čepeľ (Jaccard); Valček; Iné
pt-BR: Mecanismo do amaciador de carne: Bilro; Ferramenta múltipla/combo; Agulha/lâmina (Jaccard); Rolo de massa; Outro
vi: Cơ chế làm mềm thịt: Vồ; Công cụ đa năng/kết hợp; Kim/lưỡi dao (Jaccard); Dụng cụ lăn, cán; Khác
el: Μηχανισμός σφυριού κρέατος: Σφυρί κρέατος; Πολυεργαλείο/συνδυασμός; Βελόνα/λεπίδα (Jaccard); Πλάστης; Άλλο
nl: Mechanisme vleesvermalser: Vleeshamer; Multitool/combinatie; Naald/mes (Jaccard); Deegroller; Overig
th: กลไกของทับเนื้อนุ่ม: ไม้ตะลุมพุก; แบบอเนกประสงค์/แบบผสม; แบบเข็ม/ใบมีด (ชนิดแจ็กการ์ด); ไม้นวดแป้ง; อื่นๆ
tr: Et yumuşatıcı mekanizması: Tokmak; Çok amaçlı alet/kombine; İğneli / bıçaklı (Jaccard); Merdane; Diğer
it: Meccanismo di intenerimento della carne: Mazza; Multi-utensile/combo; Ago/lama (Jaccard); Mattarello; Altro
fi: Lihamureuttimen mekanismi: Vasara; Monitoimityökalu/yhdistelmä; Neula/terä (Jaccard); Kaulin; Muu
zh-TW: 嫩肉器機制: 鼓槌; 多功能工具/組合; 針/刀片 (Jaccard); 桿麵棍; 其他
pt-PT: Mecanismo do amaciador de carne: Martelo; Ferramenta multifuncional/combinada; Agulha/lâmina (Jaccard); Rolo de massa; Outro
lt-LT: Mėsos minkštinimo mechanizmo tipas: Tvoklelė; Daugiafunkcis įrankis / derinys; Adata/ašmenys (Jaccard); Kočėlas; Kita
ko: 고기 연육기 메커니즘: 매슈형; 다용도/콤보형; 바늘/칼날형(자카드); 롤링핀; 기타
es: Mecanismo del ablandador de carne: Mazo; Multiherramienta/combo; Aguja/hoja (Jaccard); Rodillo de cocina; Otros
ja: 肉たたきの仕組み: マレット; マルチツール/コンボ; ニードル/ブレード（ジャカード）; めん棒; その他
hr-HR: Mehanizam batova za meso: Bat; Višenamjenski alat / kombinacija; Igla/oštrica (Jaccard); Valjak za tijesto; Ostalo
nb: Mekanisme for kjøttmørning: Hammer; Multiverktøy/kombinasjon; Nål/blad (Jaccard); Kjevle; Annet
cs: Mechanismus paličky na maso: Palička; Multifunkční nástroj / kombinace; Jehly/čepele (Jaccard); Váleček; Jiné
hu: Húspuhító mechanizmus: Bárd; Multifunkciós szerszám/kombinált; Tű/penge (Jaccard); Sodrófa; Egyéb
de: Mechanismus des Fleischklopfers: Mallet; Multifunktionswerkzeug/Kombination; Nadel/Klinge (Jaccard); Teigrolle; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Mehanizem mehčalca mesa: Leseno kladivo; Večnamensko orodje/kombinacija; Igla/rezilo (Jaccard); Valjar; Druga
ro-RO: Mecanismul ciocănelului pentru carne: Ciocan; Multi-funcțional/combo; Ac/lamă (Jaccard); Sucitor; Altele
en: Meat tenderizer mechanism: Mallet; Multi-tool/combo; Needle/blade (Jaccard); Rolling pin; Other